Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2707
Evidence of debt, defined.

Evidence of debt means a writing that evidences a promise to pay or a right to the payment of a monetary obligation such as a promissory note; bond; negotiable instrument; loan, credit, or similar agreement; or monetary judgment entered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 2008, LB123, § 7.